Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142A.29, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) The definitions in this subdivision apply to this section. (b) "Date of hiring" means the earlier of: (1) the first day for which an employeenew text begin or independent contractornew text end is owed compensation by an employernew text begin or payornew text end ; or (2) the first day that an employeenew text begin or independent contractornew text end reports to work or performs labor or services for an employernew text begin or payornew text end . (c) "Earnings" means payment owed by an employer for labor or services rendered by an employeenew text begin or independent contractornew text end . (d) "Employee" means a person who resides or works in Minnesota, performs services for compensation, in whatever form, for an employer and satisfies the criteria of an employee under chapter 24 of the Internal Revenue Code. Employee does not include: (1) persons hired for domestic service in the private home of the employer, as defined in the Federal Tax Code; or (2) an employee of the federal or state agency performing intelligence or counterintelligence functions, if the head of such agency has determined that reporting according to this law would endanger the safety of the employee or compromise an ongoing investigation or intelligence mission. (e) "Employer" means a person or entity located or doing business in this state that employs one or more employees for payment, and satisfies the criteria of an employer under chapter 24 of the Internal Revenue Code. Employer includes a labor organization as defined in paragraph deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end . Employer also includes the state, political or other governmental subdivisions of the state, and the federal government. (f) "Hiring" means engaging a person to perform services for compensation and includes the reemploying or return to work of any previous employee who was laid off, furloughed, separated, granted a leave without pay, or terminated from employment when a period of 60 days elapses from the date of layoff, furlough, separation, leave, or termination to the date of the person's return to work. new text begin (g) "Independent contractor" means a person over 18 years of age, or a corporation or limited liability company with a sole shareholder or member, who performs services for compensation in an amount equal to or greater than $600 per calendar year, to another person or entity doing business in this state. Independent contractor includes but is not limited to a person who logs in as a driver to the digital network of a transportation company doing business in this state or of a company operating a network in this state to facilitate delivery of food, goods, or services. Independent contractor does not include domestic service in the private home of the service recipient. new text end deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end "Labor organization" means entities located or doing business in this state that meet the criteria of labor organization under section 2(5) of the National Labor Relations Act. This includes any entity, that may also be known as a hiring hall, used to carry out requirements described in chapter 7 of the National Labor Relations Act. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end "Payor" means a person or entity located or doing business in Minnesota who pays money to an independent contractor according to an agreement for the performance of services. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142A.29, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Work reporting system established. The commissioner of children, youth, and families shall establish a centralized work reporting system for the purpose of receiving and maintaining information from employers new text begin and payors new text end on newly hired or rehired employeesnew text begin and independent contractorsnew text end . The commissioner of children, youth, and families shall take reasonable steps to inform the state's employersnew text begin and payorsnew text end of the requirements of this section and the acceptable processes by which employersnew text begin and payorsnew text end can comply with the requirements of this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142A.29, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Duty to report. Employersnew text begin and payorsnew text end doing business in this state shall report to the commissioner of children, youth, and families the hiring of any employeenew text begin or independent contractornew text end who resides or works in this state to whom the employer anticipates paying earnings. Employersnew text begin and payorsnew text end shall submit reports required under this subdivision within 20 calendar days of the date of hiring of the employeenew text begin or independent contractornew text end . Employersnew text begin and payorsnew text end are not required to report the hiring of any person who will be employednew text begin or paidnew text end for less than two months' duration; and will have gross earnings less than $250 per month. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142A.29, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Means to report. Employersnew text begin and payorsnew text end may report by delivering, mailing, or telefaxing a copy of the employee'snew text begin or independent contractor'snew text end federal W-4 form or W-9 form or any other document that contains the required information, submitting electronic media in a compatible format, toll-free telecommunication, or other means authorized by the commissioner of children, youth, and families that will result in timely reporting. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142A.29, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Sanctions. If an employernew text begin or payornew text end fails to report under this section, the commissioner of children, youth, and families, by certified mail, shall send the employernew text begin or payornew text end a written notice of noncompliance requesting that the employernew text begin or payornew text end comply with the reporting requirements of this section. The notice of noncompliance must explain the reporting procedure under this section and advise the employernew text begin or payornew text end of the penalty for noncompliance. An employernew text begin or payornew text end who has received a notice of noncompliance and later incurs a second violation is subject to a civil penalty of $25 for each intentionally unreported employeenew text begin or independent contractornew text end . An employernew text begin or payornew text end who has received a notice of noncompliance is subject to a civil penalty of $500 for each intentionally unreported employeenew text begin or independent contractornew text end , if noncompliance is the result of a conspiracy between an employernew text begin or payornew text end and an employeenew text begin or independent contractornew text end not to supply the required report or to supply a false or incomplete report. These penalties may be imposed and collected by the commissioner of children, youth, and families. An employernew text begin or payornew text end who has been served with a notice of noncompliance and incurs a second or subsequent violation resulting in a civil penalty, has the right to a contested case hearing under chapter 14. An employernew text begin or payornew text end has 20 days from the date of service of the notice, to file a request for a contested case hearing with the commissioner. The order of the administrative law judge constitutes the final decision in the case. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142A.29, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Independent contractors. The state and all political subdivisions of the state, when acting in the capacity of an employer, shall report the hiring of any person as an independent contractor to the centralized work reporting system in the same manner as the hiring of an employee is reported. Other payors deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin shallnew text end report independent contractors to whom they make payments that require the filing of a 1099-MISC report. Payors reporting independent contractors shall report by use of the same means and provide the same information required under subdivisions 4 and 5. The commissioner of children, youth, and families shall establish procedures for payors reporting under this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end